DIAGNOSTICS -

AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEM

DI-1231

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART

If malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed for that code in the table below

(Proceed to the page given for that circuit.)

DI264-16

DTC No. .
Detection Iltem Trouble Area Memory
(See page)
00 Normal - —
. Frontroomtemperature sensor circuit e Frontroomtemp. sensor
11 * Harness or connector between frontroomtemp. sensorand 0
(DI-1241) A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
» A/C amplifier
w2 Ambienttemperature sensor circuit * Ambienttemp. sensor
12 * Harness or connector between ambienttemp. sensorand 0
(DI-1244) A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
» A/C amplifier
Frontevaporatortemperature sensor * Frontevaporatortemp. sensor
13 circuit * Harness or connector between frontevaporator temp. sen- O
(D1-1247) sor and A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
* A/C amplifier
Watertemperature communication cir- *Watertemp. sensor
cuit * Harness or connector between watertemp. sensorand en-
14 gine (and ECT) ECU
* Harness or connector between engine (and ECT) ECU and -
(DI-1250) -
A/C amplifier
*Engine (and ECT) ECU
» A/C amplifier
Rear evaporatortemperature sensor * Rear evaporatortemp. sensor
17 circuit * Harness or connector between Rear evaporatortemp. sen- Rear A/C amplifier
(DI-1252) sor and rear A/C amplifier communication data
* Rear A/C amplifier
. Rearroomtemperature sensor circuit * Rearroomtemp. sensor
19 * Harness or connector between rearroomtemp. sensorand Rear A/C amplifier
(DI-1255) rear A/C amplifier communication data
* Rear A/C amplifier
Solar sensor circuit (Open) * Solarsensor _
29 8 — » Harhess or connectorbetweernsolarsensorand-  A/C amplif
(DI-1258) Solar sensor circuit (Short) er 0
* A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
Allconditions below are detected for3 » Compressordrive belt
sec. or more » Compressor lock sensor
(a) Engine speed: 450 rpm or more * Compressor
o0 *4 (b) Ratio between engine and compres- *Engine (andECT) ECU
(DI-1261) sorrpmdeviates 20% or more in com- * Harness or connector between compressor lock sensorand -
parison to normal operation. engine (and ECT) ECU
«Harness or connector between engine (and ECT) ECU and
A/C amplifier
* A/C amplifier
Openin pressure sensor circuit ¢ Pressure switch
23 Abnormal refrigerant pressure * Harness or connector between pressure switchand A/C
(DI-1264) [below 196 kPa (2.0 kgf/cm o 28psi) amplifier -
over3, 140kPa(32.0kgf/lcm ,455psi)]| ¢ Refrigerantpipeline
* A/C amplifier
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DIAGNOSTICS - AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEM
Rear linlet air temperature sensor circuit | » Rear inlet air temp. sensor
26 *Harness or connector between rear inlet air temp. sensor Rear A/C amplifier
(DI-1267) and rear A/C amplifier communication data
*Rear A/C amplifier
Front air mix damper position sensor * Front air mix damper position sensor
31 circuit ¢ Harness or connector between front air mix damper position 0
(DI-1270) sensor and A/C amplifier (1 min. or more)
* A/C amplifier
Air inlet damper position sensor circuit |  Air inlet damper position sensor sensor
32 *Harness or connector between air inlet damper position 0
(DI-1273) sensor and A/C amplifier (1 min. or more)
* A/C amplifier
Rear air mix damper position sensor cir- | ® Rear air mix damper position sensor
37 cuit eHarness or connector between rear air mix damper position | Rear A/C amplifier
(DI-1276) sensor and rear A/C amplifier communication data
*Rear A/C amplifier
Front air mix damper control servomotor |  Front air mix damper control servomotor
41 circuit *Harness or connector between front air mix damper control O
(DI-1270 servomotor and A/C amplifier (15 secs. or more)
DI-1279) -
* A/C amplifier
40 Air inlet damper control servomotor cir- |  Air inlet damper control servomotor
cuit *Harness or connector between air inlet damper control ser- 0
(DI-1273 o
DI-1282) vomotor e'lr'1d A/C amplifier (15 secs. or more)
* A/C amplifier
Rear Air mix damper control servomotor | ¢ Rear air mix damper control servomotor
(le17276 circuit *Harness or connector between rear air mix damper control Rear A/C amplifier
servomotor and rear A/C amplifier communication data
DI-1285) -
*Rear A/C amplifier
HINT:

« ™ Ifthe room temp. is approx. -20° C (-4°F) or less, DTC 11 may be light up even though the system
is normal.
«  "2|fthe ambient temperature is approx. -50° C (-58° F) or less, a DTC may be output even though the
system is normal.
« * [fthe check is being performed in a dark place, DTC 21 (solar sensor circuit abnormal) could be dis-
played. In this case, perform DTC check again while shining a light, such as an inspection light, on the
s?lar sensor. If DTC 21 is still displayed, there could be trouble in the solar sensor circuit.
« * Compressor lock (DTC 22) is indicated only for a current malfunction. (See page DI-1261)
To confirm DTC 22, preform the following steps.
(1) Withthe engine ON, enterthe DTC check mode.

()
3)
(4)
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Press the R/F SW to enter actuator check mode, and set the operation to Step No. 3.
Press the AUTO SW to return to DTC check mode.
The DTC is displayed after approx. 3 secs.




